Louisiana, session 2026, SB442.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:337.9(G) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§337.9. Exemptions applicable to local tax in Chapters 2, 2-A, and 2-B; other
exemptions applicable
* * *
G. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 47:301.7, charges for the
furnishing of repairs, including interior modifications, overhaul, and upgrades,
to an aircraft registered outside of Louisiana shall be exempt from the sales and
use taxes levied by any taxing authority in Calcasieu Parish provided that the
repairs are performed at an airport with a runway that is at least ten thousand
seven hundred feet long and two hundred feet wide with a layer of concrete that
is at least seventeen inches thick. The provisions of this Subsection shall be
applicable only to local sales and use taxes levied by taxing authorities in
Calcasieu Parish.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to taxable periods beginning on or
after July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 442 ENROLLED
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.